Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-603
Powers; rights; laws governing.

The association shall have all the powers and rights, now conferred by law upon cemetery associations organized with no view to profit, and shall be governed by the provisions of law applicable to such associations, except that, as to the provisions for a perpetual care fund, such association shall comply with the provisions of this section and sections 12-606 to 12-618, and shall not be subject to the provisions of sections 12-501 to 12-512.08, except as modified by the provisions of sections 12-601 to 12-605, or laws amendatory thereto.

Laws 1913, c. 168, § 3, p. 512;

R.S.1913, § 711;

C.S.1922, § 620;

C.S.1929, § 13-603;

R.S.1943, § 12-603;

Laws 1957, c. 18, § 14, p. 149.

Unsold crypts, rights, and lots are subject to payment of indebtedness. Omaha Nat. Bank v. West Lawn Mausoleum Assn., 158 Neb. 412, 63 N.W.2d 504 (1954).